Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.140

Assault of a child in the third degree.

(1) A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of the crime of assault of a child in the third degree if the child is under the age of thirteen and the person commits the crime of assault in the third degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.031(1) (d) or (f) against the child.

(2) Assault of a child in the third degree is a class C felony.

[ 1992 c 145 s 3.]